California statutes. Water Code
(C) A detailed description of the tasks and time schedules required to investigate and implement various elements of pollution prevention techniques.

(D) A statement of the discharger’s pollution prevention goals and strategies, including priorities for short-term and long-term action.

(E) A description of the discharger’s intended pollution prevention activities for the immediate future.

(F) A description of the discharger’s existing pollution prevention methods.

(G) A statement that the discharger’s existing and planned pollution prevention strategies do not constitute cross-media pollution transfers, and information that supports that statement.

(H) Toxic chemical release data for those dischargers subject to Section 313 of the Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11023).

(I) Proof of compliance with the Hazardous Waste Source Reduction and Management Review Act of 1989 (Article 11.9 (commencing with Section 25244.12) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code) if the discharger is also subject to that act.

(J) An analysis of the relative costs and benefits of the possible pollution prevention activities.

(3) A regional board may require a POTW to complete a pollution prevention plan that includes all of the following:

(A) An estimate of all of the sources of a pollutant contributing, or potentially contributing, to the loadings of a pollutants in the treatment plant influent.

(B) An analysis of the methods that could be used to prevent the discharge of the pollutants into the POTW, including application of local limits to industrial or commercial dischargers regarding pollution prevention techniques, public education and outreach, or other innovative and alternative approaches to reduce discharges of the pollutant to the POTW. The analysis also shall identify sources, or potential sources, not within the ability or authority of the POTW to control, such as pollutants in the potable water supply, airborne pollutants, pharmaceuticals, or pesticides, and estimate the magnitude of those sources, to the extent feasible.

(C) An estimate of load reductions that may be attained through the methods identified in subparagraph (B).

(D) A plan for monitoring the results of the pollution prevention program.

(E) A description of the tasks, cost, and time required to investigate and implement various elements in the pollution prevention plan.

(F) A statement of the POTW’s pollution prevention goals and strategies, including priorities for short-term and long-term action, and a description of the POTW’s intended pollution prevention activities for the immediate future.

(G) A description of the POTW’s existing pollution prevention programs.

(H) An analysis, to the extent feasible, of any adverse environmental impacts, including cross-media impacts or substitute chemicals, that may result from the implementation of the pollution prevention program.

(I) An analysis, to the extent feasible, of the costs and benefits that may be incurred to implement the pollution prevention program.

(e) The state board or the regional board may establish a schedule of actions identified in the pollution prevention plans for the discharger.

(f) The state board or regional board shall solicit comments from the public on a pollution prevention plan prepared pursuant to this section and address the public comments when determining what schedule of actions, if any, to establish for the discharger pursuant to this section.

(g) The state board and regional boards shall make the pollution prevention plans available for public review, except to the extent that information is classified as confidential because it is a trade secret. Trade secret information shall be set forth in an appendix that is not available to the public.

(h) Any costs incurred by the state board or a regional board resulting from actions required by this section shall be paid for from revenue generated by the fees imposed by Section 13260.

(i) The state board or regional board may assess civil penalties pursuant to Section 13385 against a discharger for failure to complete a pollution prevention plan ordered by the state board or a regional board, or for failure to comply with a schedule of actions ordered by the state board or a regional board pursuant to this section.

(j) A POTW may assess civil penalties and civil administrative penalties pursuant to Sections 54740, 54740.5, and 54740.6 of the Government Code against an industrial discharger for failure to complete a pollution prevention plan when ordered by the POTW, for submitting a plan that does not comply with the act, or for failure to comply with a schedule of actions ordered by the POTW pursuant to this section, unless the regional board has assessed penalties for the same action.

(k) A discharger may change its pollution prevention plan, including withdrawing from a pollution prevention measure approved by the state board, a regional board, or a POTW, if the discharger determines that the measure will have a negative impact on product quality, the safe operation of the facility, or the environmental aspects of the facilities operation, and the discharger demonstrates to the board or the POTW an alternative measure that achieves that same pollution prevention objective.

(l) The state board shall adopt a format to be used by dischargers for completing the plan required by this section. The format shall address all of the factors the discharger is required to include in the plan. The board may include any other factors determined by the board to be necessary to carry out this section. The adoption of the format pursuant to this section is not subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 92, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.   See the prevailing Section 13263.3 (added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 93), as amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 807, with same subject matter but with substantive differences.)
-------------------------------------------

13263.3.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that pollution prevention should be the first step in a hierarchy for reducing pollution and managing wastes, and to achieve environmental stewardship for society. The Legislature also finds and declares that pollution prevention is necessary to support the federal goal of zero discharge of pollutants into navigable waters.

(b) (1) For the purposes of this section, “pollution prevention” means any action that causes a net reduction in the use or generation of a hazardous substance or other pollutant that is discharged into water and includes any of the following:

(A) “Input change,” which means a change in raw materials or feedstocks used in a production process or operation so as to reduce, avoid, or eliminate the generation of pollutants discharged in wastewater.

(B) “Operational improvement,” which means improved site management so as to reduce, avoid, or eliminate the generation of pollutants discharged in wastewater.

(C) “Production process change,” which means a change in a process, method, or technique that is used to produce a product or a desired result, including the return of materials or their components for reuse within the existing processes or operations, so as to reduce, avoid, or eliminate the generation of pollutants discharged in wastewater.

(D) “Product reformulation,” which means changes in design, composition, or specifications of end products, including product substitution, so as to reduce, avoid, or eliminate the generation of problem pollutants discharged in wastewater.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “pollution prevention” does not include actions that merely shift a pollutant in wastewater from one environmental medium to another environmental medium, unless clear environmental benefits of such an approach are identified to the satisfaction of the state board, the regional board, or POTW.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “discharger” means any entity required to obtain a national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit pursuant to the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), or any entity subject to the pretreatment program as defined in Part 403 (commencing with Section 403.1) of Subchapter N of Chapter 1 of Part 403 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) (1) The state board, a regional board, or a POTW may require a discharger subject to its jurisdiction to complete and implement a pollution prevention plan if any of the following apply:

(A) A discharger is determined by the state board to be a chronic violator, and the state board, a regional board, or the POTW determines that pollution prevention could assist in achieving compliance.

(B) The discharger significantly contributes, or has the potential to significantly contribute, to the creation of a toxic hot spot as defined in Section 13391.5.

(C) The state board, a regional board, or a POTW determines pollution prevention is necessary to achieve a water quality objective.

(D) The discharger is subject to a cease and desist order issued pursuant to Section 13301 or a time schedule order issued pursuant to Section 13300 or 13308.

(2) A pollution prevention plan required of a discharger other than a POTW pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include all of the following:

(A) An analysis of one or more of the pollutants, as directed by the state board, a regional board, or a POTW, that the facility discharges into water or introduces into POTWs, a description of the sources of the pollutants, and a comprehensive review of the processes used by the discharger that result in the generation and discharge of the pollutants.

(B) An analysis of the potential for pollution prevention to reduce the generation of the pollutants, including the application of innovative and alternative technologies and any adverse environmental impacts resulting from the use of those methods.

(C) A detailed description of the tasks and time schedules required to investigate and implement various elements of pollution prevention techniques.

(D) A statement of the discharger’s pollution prevention goals and strategies, including priorities for short-term and long-term action.

(E) A description of the discharger’s existing pollution prevention methods.

(F) A statement that the discharger’s existing and planned pollution prevention strategies do not constitute cross media pollution transfers unless clear environmental benefits of such an approach are identified to the satisfaction of the state board, the regional board, or the POTW, and information that supports that statement.

(G) Proof of compliance with the Hazardous Waste Source Reduction and Management Review Act of 1989 (Article 11.9 (commencing with Section 25244.12) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code) if the discharger is also subject to that act.

(H) An analysis, to the extent feasible, of the relative costs and benefits of the possible pollution prevention activities.

(I) A specification of, and rationale for, the technically feasible and economically practicable pollution prevention measures selected by the discharger for implementation.

(3) The state board or a regional board may require a POTW to complete and implement a pollution prevention plan that includes all of the following:

(A) An estimate of all of the sources of a pollutant contributing, or potentially contributing, to the loading of that pollutant in the treatment plant influent.

(B) An analysis of the methods that could be used to prevent the discharge of the pollutants into the POTW, including application of local limits to industrial or commercial dischargers regarding pollution prevention techniques, public education and outreach, or other innovative and alternative approaches to reduce discharges of the pollutant to the POTW. The analysis also shall identify sources, or potential sources, not within the ability or authority of the POTW to control, such as pollutants in the potable water supply, airborne pollutants, pharmaceuticals, or pesticides, and estimate the magnitude of those sources, to the extent feasible.

(C) An estimate of load reductions that may be attained through the methods identified in subparagraph (B).

(D) A plan for monitoring the results of the pollution prevention program.

(E) A description of the tasks, cost, and time required to investigate and implement various elements in the pollution prevention plan.

(F) A statement of the POTW’s pollution prevention goals and strategies, including priorities for short-term and long-term action, and a description of the POTW’s intended pollution prevention activities for the immediate future.

(G) A description of the POTW’s existing pollution prevention programs.

(H) An analysis, to the extent feasible, of any adverse environmental impacts, including cross media impacts or substitute chemicals, that may result from the implementation of the pollution prevention program.

(I) An analysis, to the extent feasible, of the costs and benefits that may be incurred to implement the pollution prevention program.

(e) The state board, a regional board, or a POTW may require a discharger subject to this section to comply with the pollution prevention plan developed by the discharger after providing an opportunity for comment at a public proceeding with regard to that plan.

(f) The state board, regional boards, and POTWs shall make the pollution prevention plans available for public review, except to the extent that information is classified as confidential because it is a trade secret. Trade secret information shall be set forth in an appendix that is not available to the public.

(g) The state board or regional board may assess civil liability pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 13385 against a discharger for failure to complete a pollution prevention plan required by the state board or a regional board, for submitting a plan that does not comply with the act, or for not implementing a plan, unless the POTW has assessed penalties for the same action.

(h) A POTW may assess civil penalties and civil administrative penalties pursuant to Sections 54740, 54740.5, and 54740.6 of the Government Code against a discharger for failure to complete a pollution prevention plan when required by the POTW, for submitting a plan that does not comply with the act, or for not implementing a plan, unless the state board or a regional board has assessed penalties for the same action.

(i) A discharger may change its pollution prevention plan, including withdrawing from a pollution prevention measure required by the state board, a regional board, or a POTW, if the discharger determines that the measure will have a negative impact on product quality, the safe operation of the facility, or the environmental aspects of the facility’s operation, or the discharger determines that the measure is economically impracticable or technologically infeasible. Where practicable and feasible, the discharger shall replace the withdrawn measure with a measure that will likely achieve similar pollution prevention objectives. A measure may be withdrawn pursuant to this subdivision only with the approval of the executive officer of the state board or the regional board, or the POTW.

(j) The state board shall adopt a sample format to be used by dischargers for completing the plan required by this section. The sample format shall address all of the factors the discharger is required to include in the plan. The board may include any other factors determined by the board to be necessary to carry out this section. The adoption of the sample format pursuant to this section is not subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(k) The state board, a regional board, or POTW may not include a pollution prevention plan in any waste discharge requirements or other permit issued by that agency.

(l) This section prevails over Section 13263.3, as added to the Water Code by Assembly Bill 1104 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 93) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 807, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13263.5.

(a) When the regional board issues waste discharge requirements pursuant to Section 13263, or revises waste discharge requirements pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 25159.17 of the Health and Safety Code, for any injection well into which hazardous waste is discharged, the waste discharge requirements shall be based upon the information contained in the hydrogeological assessment report prepared pursuant to Section 25159.18 of the Health and Safety Code and shall include conditions in the waste discharge requirements to ensure that the waters of the state are not polluted or threatened with pollution.

(b) If the state board applies to the federal Environmental Protection Agency to administer the Underground Injection Control Program pursuant to Part 145 (commencing with Section 145.1) of Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that application shall not include a request to administer the Underground Injection Control Program for any oil, gas, or geothermal injection wells supervised or regulated by the Division of Oil and Gas pursuant to Section 3106 or 3714 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

13263.6.

(a) A publicly owned treatment works (POTW) may require pollution prevention plans as described in Section 13263.3 as part of the pretreatment requirements applicable to significant industrial users.

(b) The state board or a regional board shall prescribe effluent limitations as part of the waste discharge requirements of a POTW for all substances that the most recent toxic chemical release data reported to the state emergency response commission pursuant to Section 313 of the Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11023) indicate are discharged into the POTW and that the state board or a regional board has determined has the reasonable potential to impair water quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 92, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.   See the prevailing Section 13263.6 added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 93, with same subject matter, but with substantive differences.)
-------------------------------------------

13263.6.

(a) The regional board shall prescribe effluent limitations as part of the waste discharge requirements of a POTW for all substances that the most recent toxic chemical release data reported to the state emergency response commission pursuant to Section 313 of the Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11023) indicate as discharged into the POTW, for which the state board or the regional board has established numeric water quality objectives, and has determined that the discharge is or may be discharged at a level which will cause, have the reasonable potential to cause, or contribute to, an excursion above any numeric water quality objective.

(b) This section prevails over Section 13263.6, as added to the Water Code by Assembly Bill 1104 of the 1999–2000 Regular Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 93, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

13263.7.

(a) Compliance with effluent limitations and any other permit or waste discharge requirements, as appropriate, for the release or discharge of recycled water determined to be suitable for direct potable reuse or surface water augmentation, as defined in Section 13561, into a conveyance facility may be determined at the point where the recycled water enters the conveyance facility but prior to commingling with any raw water.

(b) Before the discharge may be allowed, consent must be obtained from the owner or operator of the conveyance facility that directly receives the recycled water.

(c) This section does not limit or restrict the
 authority of the State Water Resources Control Board.

(d) For purposes of this section, “raw water” means surface water or groundwater in its naturally occurring state prior to treatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 635, Sec. 4.   (AB 803)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13264.

(a) No person shall initiate any new discharge of waste or make any material changes in any discharge, or initiate a discharge to, make any material changes in a discharge to, or construct, an injection well, prior to the filing of the report required by Section 13260 and no person shall take any of these actions after filing the report but before whichever of the following occurs first:

(1) The issuance of waste discharge requirements pursuant to Section 13263.

(2) The expiration of 140 days after compliance with Section 13260 if the waste to be discharged does not create or threaten to create a condition of pollution or nuisance and any of the following applies:

(A) The project is not subject to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(B) The regional board is the lead agency for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act, a negative declaration is required, and at least 105 days have expired since the regional board assumed lead agency responsibility.

(C) The regional board is the lead agency for the purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act, and environmental impact report or written documentation prepared to meet the requirements of Section 21080.5 of the Public Resources Code is required, and at least one year has expired since the regional board assumed lead agency responsibility.

(D) The regional board is a responsible agency for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act, and at least 90 days have expired since certification or approval of environmental documentation by the lead agency.

(3) The issuance of a waiver pursuant to Section 13269.

(b) The Attorney General, at the request of a regional board, shall petition the superior court for the issuance of a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction, or combination thereof, as may be appropriate, prohibiting any person who is violating or threatening to violate this section from doing any of the following, whichever is applicable:

(1) Discharging the waste or fluid.

(2) Making any material change in the discharge.

(3) Constructing the injection well.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, moneys collected under this division for a violation pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be deposited in the Waste Discharge Permit Fund and separately accounted for in that fund.

(2) The funds described in paragraph (1) shall be expended by the state board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to assist regional boards, and other public agencies with authority to clean up waste or abate the effects of the waste, in cleaning up or abating the effects of the waste on waters of the state or for the purposes authorized in Section 13443.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 683, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13265.

(a) Any person discharging waste in violation of Section 13264, after such violation has been called to his attention in writing by the regional board, is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be liable civilly in accordance with subdivision (b). Each day of such discharge shall constitute a separate offense.

(b) (1) Civil liability may be administratively imposed by a regional board in accordance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (a) in an amount which shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(2) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court in accordance with Articles 5 (commencing with Section 13350) and 6 (commencing with Section 13360) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (a) in an amount which shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(c) Any person discharging hazardous waste, as defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code, in violation of Section 13264 is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be liable civilly in accordance with subdivision (d). That liability shall not be imposed if the discharger is not negligent and immediately files a report of the discharge with the board, or if the regional board determines that the violation of Section 13264 was insubstantial.

This subdivision shall not be applicable to any waste discharge which is subject to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 13370).

(d) (1) Civil liability may be administratively imposed by a regional board in accordance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (c) in an amount which shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(2) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court in accordance with Articles 5 (commencing with Section 13350) and 6 (commencing with Section 13360) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (c) in an amount which shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1541, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13266.

Pursuant to such regulations as the regional board may prescribe, each city, county, or city and county shall notify the regional board of the filing of a tentative subdivision map, or of any application for a building permit which may involve the discharge of waste, other than discharges into a community sewer system and discharges from dwellings involving five-family units or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13267.

(a) A regional board, in establishing or reviewing any water quality control plan or waste discharge requirements, or in connection with any action relating to any plan or requirement authorized by this division, may investigate the quality of any waters of the state within its region.

(b) (1) In conducting an investigation specified in subdivision (a), the regional board may require that any person who has discharged, discharges, or is suspected of having discharged or discharging, or who proposes to discharge waste within its region, or any citizen or domiciliary, or political agency or entity of this state who has discharged, discharges, or is suspected of having discharged or discharging, or who
 proposes to discharge, waste outside of its region that could affect the quality of waters within its region shall furnish, under penalty of perjury, technical or monitoring program reports which the regional board requires. The burden, including costs, of these reports shall bear a reasonable relationship to the need for the report and the benefits to be obtained from the reports. In requiring those reports, the regional board shall provide the person with a written explanation with regard to the need for the reports, and shall identify the evidence that supports requiring that person to provide the reports.

(2) When requested by the person furnishing a report, the portions of a report that might disclose trade secrets or secret processes may not be made available for inspection by the public but shall be made available to governmental agencies for use in making studies. However, these portions of a report shall be available for use by the
 state or any state agency in judicial review or enforcement proceedings involving the person furnishing the report.

(c) In conducting an investigation pursuant to subdivision (a), the regional board may inspect the facilities of any person to ascertain whether the purposes of this division are being met and waste discharge requirements are being complied with. The inspection shall be made with the consent of the owner or possessor of the facilities or, if the consent is withheld, with a warrant duly issued pursuant to the procedure set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. However, in the event of an emergency affecting the public health or safety, an inspection may be performed without consent or the issuance of a warrant.

(d) The regional board may participate in an inspection of an unlicensed cannabis cultivation site
 conducted pursuant to a warrant duly issued pursuant to the Penal Code when requested by the party seeking that warrant, and when there is probable cause that the unlicensed cannabis cultivation and its associated activities may involve the discharge of waste in violation of this division or of any principles and guidelines established pursuant to Section 13149. 

(e) The state board or a regional board may require any person, including a person subject to a waste discharge requirement under Section 13263, who is discharging, or who proposes to discharge, wastes or fluid into an injection well, to furnish the state board or regional board with a complete report on the condition and operation of the facility or injection well, or any other information that may be reasonably required to determine whether the injection well could affect the quality of the waters of the state.

(f) As
 used in this section, “evidence” means any relevant evidence on which responsible persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of serious affairs, regardless of the existence of any common law or statutory rule that might make improper the admission of the evidence over objection in a civil action.

(g) The state board may carry out the authority granted to a regional board pursuant to this section if, after consulting with the regional board, the state board determines that it will not duplicate the efforts of the regional board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 158, Sec. 5.   (SB 756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13267.5.

(a) In conducting an investigation pursuant to Section 13267 that includes collection of information about discharge of wastewater produced from an oil or gas field, a regional board or the state board may require that the applicable person or entity shall furnish to that board information relating to all chemicals in the discharged wastewater pursuant to the procedures set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 13267.

(b) If a person or entity subject to the disclosure requirement in subdivision (a) is unable to obtain information about a chemical from the chemical’s supplier for any reason, including, but not limited to, assertion by the supplier of trade secret protections, the regional board or state board may require that the supplier shall furnish that
 information to that board pursuant to the procedures set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 13267.

(c) The trade secret protections of subdivision (b) of Section 13267 shall apply to information disclosed pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) when requested by a person or entity or a supplier, as applicable.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the information collected by a regional board or the state board pursuant to this section shall be made available to the public on the internet website of the regional board or the state board.

(e) In collecting information described in this section, a regional board
 or the state board may consult with the Geologic Energy Management Division
 regarding information collected by the division, pursuant to other disclosure requirements, that may be useful to the investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 24.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13268.

(a) (1) Any person failing or refusing to furnish technical or monitoring program reports as required by subdivision (b) of Section 13267, failing or refusing to furnish information as required by subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 13267.5, or failing or refusing to furnish a statement of compliance as required by subdivision (b) of Section 13399.2, or falsifying any information provided therein, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and may be liable civilly in accordance with subdivision (b).

(2) Any person who knowingly commits any violation described in paragraph (1) is subject to criminal penalties pursuant to subdivision (e).

(b) (1) Civil liability may be administratively imposed by a regional board in accordance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (a) in an amount which shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(2) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 13350) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 13360) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (a) in an amount which shall not exceed five thousand dollars
 ($5,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(c) Any person discharging hazardous waste, as defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code, who knowingly fails or refuses to furnish technical or monitoring program reports as required by subdivision (b) of Section 13267, or who knowingly falsifies any information provided in those technical or monitoring program reports, is guilty of a misdemeanor, may be civilly liable in accordance with subdivision (d), and is subject to criminal penalties pursuant to subdivision (e).

(d) (1) Civil liability may be administratively imposed by a regional board in accordance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (c) in an amount which shall not exceed
 five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(2) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 13350) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 13360) of Chapter 5 for a violation of subdivision (c) in an amount which shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), any person who knowingly commits any of the violations set forth in subdivision (a) or (c) shall be punished by a fine that does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(2) Any person who knowingly commits any of the violations set forth in
 subdivision (a) or (c) after a prior conviction for a violation set forth in subdivision (a) or (c) shall be punished by a fine that does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day of the violation.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, fines collected pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be deposited in the Waste Discharge Permit Fund and separately accounted for in that fund.

(2) The funds described in paragraph (1) shall be expended by the state board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to assist regional boards, and other public agencies with authority to clean up waste, or abate the effects of the waste, in cleaning up or abating the effects of the waste on waters of the state or for the purposes authorized in Section
 13443.

(g) The state board may carry out the authority granted to a regional board pursuant to this section if, after consulting with the regional board, the state board determines that it will not duplicate the efforts of the regional board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 758, Sec. 2.   (AB 1328)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13269.

(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2000, the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 13260, subdivision (a) of Section 13263, or subdivision (a) of Section 13264 may be waived by the state board or a regional board as to a specific discharge or type of discharge if the state board or a regional board determines, after any necessary state board or regional board meeting, that the waiver is consistent with any applicable state or regional water quality control plan and is in the public interest. The state board or a regional board shall give notice of any necessary meeting by publication pursuant to Section 11125 of the Government Code.

(2) A waiver may not exceed five years in duration, but may be renewed by the state board or a regional board. The waiver shall be conditional and may be terminated at any time by the state board or a regional board. The conditions of the waiver shall include, but need not be limited to, the performance of individual, group, or watershed-based monitoring, except as provided in paragraph (3). Monitoring requirements shall be designed to support the development and implementation of the waiver program, including, but not limited to, verifying the adequacy and effectiveness of the waiver’s conditions. In establishing monitoring requirements, the regional board may consider the volume, duration, frequency, and constituents of the discharge; the extent and type of existing monitoring activities, including, but not limited to, existing watershed-based, compliance, and effectiveness monitoring efforts; the size of the project area; and other relevant factors. Monitoring results shall be made available to the public.

(3) The state board or a regional board may waive the monitoring requirements described in this subdivision for discharges that it determines do not pose a significant threat to water quality.

(4) (A) The state board or a regional board may include as a condition of a waiver the payment of an annual fee established by the state board in accordance with subdivision (f) of Section 13260.

(B) Funds generated by the payment of the fee shall be deposited in the Waste Discharge Permit Fund for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the state board or appropriate regional board for the purpose of carrying out activities limited to those necessary to establish and implement the waiver program pursuant to this section. The total amount of annual fees collected pursuant to this section shall not exceed the costs of those activities necessary to establish and implement waivers of waste discharge requirements pursuant to this section.

(C) In establishing the amount of a fee that may be imposed on irrigated agriculture operations pursuant to this section, the state board shall consider relevant factors, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The size of the operations.

(ii) Any compliance costs borne by the operations pursuant to state and federal water quality regulations.

(iii) Any costs associated with water quality monitoring performed or funded by the operations.

(iv) Participation in a watershed management program approved by the applicable regional board.

(D) In establishing the amount of a fee that may be imposed on silviculture operations pursuant to this section, the state board shall consider relevant factors, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The size of the operations.

(ii) Any compliance costs borne by the operations pursuant to state and federal water quality regulations.

(iii) Any costs associated with water quality monitoring performed or funded by the operations.

(iv) The average annual number of timber harvest plans proposed by the operations.

(5) The state board or a regional board shall give notice of the adoption of a waiver by publication within the affected county or counties as set forth in Section 6061 of the Government Code.
